California, session 20252026, SB1398.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8316 of the Government Code is amended to read:8316. (a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), all new building and major renovation projects larger than 10,000 gross square feet undertaken by state agencies shall obtain LEED Gold Gold, Three Green Globes, or higher certification using the version of LEED or Green Globes that is in effect at the time the project schematic design documents are initiated by the state agency. Certification to an alternative equivalent or higher rating system or standard, if any, is only acceptable when approved by the Director of General Services.(2) If the state agency concerned makes a finding that achieving LEED Gold or Three Green Globes conflicts with critical operational or security requirements, can be demonstrated to be cost ineffective, or conflicts with requirements in the California Building Code, the state agency shall instead obtain LEED Silver or Two Green Globes certification using the version of LEED or Green Globes that is in effect at the time the project schematic design documents are initiated by the state agency.(b) (1) This section applies to projects for which the project schematic design documents are initiated by the state agency on or after January 1, 2024.(2) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this paragraph shall apply to projects for which the project schematic design documents are initiated by the state agency on or after January 1, 2027.(c) For purposes of this section:(1) “Green Globes” means the certification program under the auspices of the Green Building Initiative.(1)(2) “LEED” means the Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design building certification program under the auspices of the United States Green Building Council.(2)(3) “Major renovation” is a renovation of a structure in which most of the major building systems are either replaced or upgraded.(3)(4) “State agency” does not include a district agricultural association as described in Part 3 (commencing with Section 3801) of Division 3 of the Food and Agricultural Code.SECTION 1.The Legislature finds and declares that it is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation relating to state buildings.